Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1117.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Protecting Pennsylvania Police Act.Section 2. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Local control of law enforcement agencies in this Commonwealth is of vital importance to the residents of this Commonwealth.(2) Local control of law enforcement agencies in this Commonwealth is essential to preserve public safety.(3) The General Assembly must take steps to ensure the maintenance of local control of law enforcement agencies in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Definitions.123456789101112131415161718 The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commandeering." Taking control of or seizing the assets, personnel or operations of a law enforcement agency without express authority having been formally given by the Commonwealth or the appropriate political subdivision."Law enforcement agency." An employer of a law enforcement officer."Law enforcement officer." An individual who by virtue of the individual's office or public employment is vested by law with a duty to maintain public order or to make arrests for offenses, whether that duty extends to all offenses or is limited to specific offenses.Section 4. Prohibition.A law enforcement agency shall not be subject to commandeering by the Federal Government, through executive order, action of the President of the United States or an act of the Congress of the United States.Section 5. Enforcement.The Office of Attorney General and the district attorney of the county in which commandeering or attempted commandeering has occurred shall have concurrent jurisdiction to institute an action to enforce this act.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB1117PN1370 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526